Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9608
Good-faith recommendation; effect on discipline or adverse licensure action.

A good-faith recommendation to an eligible patient regarding access to treatment with an investigational drug, biological product, or device shall not subject the health care provider to discipline or an adverse licensure action.

This section does not preclude any penalties under federal law, including 42 U.S.C. 1395.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 8.
July 19, 2018